Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 19 Field Trials and Shooting Preserves

20-19-1.
Field trials.

No person shall conduct a field trial, at which domestic game birds may be taken by shooting, within this state, unless a license has been obtained from the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 27, § 1.

20-19-2.
Shooting preserves.

No person shall operate a shooting preserve unless a license has been obtained from the director. Domestic game birds may be released and taken by shooting at shooting preserves. The following requirements must be followed in shooting preserves:

The shooting area is a single body of land not less than one hundred twenty (120) acres in size, and is accurately described in the application;

The licensee shall keep an accurate record of all domestic game held by him or her, how, when, and where acquired, how many released and when released, how many taken on the area, by whom, and when, and shall provide this information to the department when required;

The licensee shall attach to each domestic game bird killed on the area a band furnished by the department for which the licensee shall pay the cost of purchase or manufacture;

Domestic game birds taken on a shooting preserve may be possessed and transported in any number but only when bearing the prescribed band; and

Every person hunting or taking domestic game birds on a shooting preserve has a valid Rhode Island hunting license or a special license permitting the taking of domestic game on shooting preserves only.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 27, § 1.

20-19-3.
Use of domestic game birds.

Only domestic game birds may be utilized by persons conducting a field trial or operating a shooting preserve subject to the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-19-4.
Laws inapplicable to field trials and shooting preserves.

The provisions of §

4-1-5

and chapter 13 of this title shall not be construed to apply to shooting preserves; to field trials upon liberated, domestic game birds; or to the possession, releasing, or shooting of liberated domestic game birds at field trials or upon shooting preserves licensed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.